Utah statutes.
79-3-505.   Paleontological landmarks.

(1) (a)  Sites of significance or sites with exceptional fossils may be recommended to and approved by the board as state paleontological landmarks.

(b)  No privately owned site or site on school or institutional trust lands may be so designated without the written consent of the owner or the trust.

(2)  A person may not excavate on a privately owned designated landmark without a permit from the survey.

(3)  Before an alteration is commenced on a designated landmark, three months notice of intent to alter the site shall be given the survey.

